District of Columbia statutes.
8-1023

Repealed

Minimum recycled content rules.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 26
as added Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-208, § 2, 37 DCR 8458
July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-130, § 2(b), 39 DCR 4054
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 19(c), 40 DCR 6311
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
This section is referenced in § 8-1021.
1981 Ed., § 6-3423.
The “Newsprint Recycling Amendment Act of 1992,” referred to in (a), is D.C. Law 9-130.
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.